Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202686-1033
Purpose of act.

The purpose of the 911 Service System Act is to establish the Public Service Commission as the statewide implementation and coordinating authority to plan, implement, coordinate, manage, maintain, and provide funding assistance for a 911 service system consistent and compatible with national public safety standards advanced by recognized standards and development organizations.

Laws 2016, LB938, § 2;

R.S.1943, (2024), § 86-1002;

Laws 2025, LB362, § 15.